Florida, session 2026, SB1386.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 25 26 Section 1.âPresent subsections (8) and (9) of section 27 381.0065, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (9) 28 and (10), respectively, and a new subsection (8) is added to 29 that section, to read: 30 381.0065âOnsite sewage treatment and disposal systems; 31 regulation.â 32 (8)âPERIODIC INSPECTIONS.âEffective July 1, 2026, the owner 33 of an onsite sewage treatment and disposal system, excluding a 34 system required to have an operating permit, must have the 35 system inspected at least once every 5 years to assess the 36 fundamental operational condition of the system, prolong the 37 life of the system, and identify any failure within the system. 38 The department shall administer an onsite sewage treatment and 39 disposal system inspection program for such periodic 40 inspections. The department shall implement the program 41 standards, procedures, and requirements and adopt rules that 42 must include, at a minimum, all of the following: 43 (a)âA schedule for a 5-year inspection cycle. 44 (b)âA county-by-county implementation plan phased in over a 45 10-year period, with first priority given to those areas within 46 a priority focus area for springs identified by the department. 47 (c)âMinimum standards for a functioning system. 48 (d)âRequirements for the pumpout or repair of a failing 49 system. 50 (e)âEnforcement procedures for failure of a system owner to 51 obtain an inspection of the system and for failure of a 52 contractor to timely report inspection results to the department 53 and the system owner. 54 Section 2.âParagraph (a) of subsection (7) of section 55 403.067, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 56 403.067âEstablishment and implementation of total maximum 57 daily loads.â 58 (7)âDEVELOPMENT OF BASIN MANAGEMENT PLANS AND 59 IMPLEMENTATION OF TOTAL MAXIMUM DAILY LOADS.â 60 (a)âBasin management action plans.â 61 1.âIn developing and implementing the total maximum daily 62 load for a waterbody, the department, or the department in 63 conjunction with a water management district, may develop a 64 basin management action plan that addresses some or all of the 65 watersheds and basins tributary to the waterbody. Such plan must 66 integrate the appropriate management strategies available to the 67 state through existing water quality protection programs to 68 achieve the total maximum daily loads and may provide for phased 69 implementation of these management strategies to promote timely, 70 cost-effective actions as provided for in s. 403.151. Estimated 71 pollutant load reductions in a basin management action plan must 72 meet or exceed the total amount of pollutant load reductions 73 needed to meet the total maximum daily load requirements under 74 the plan. The plan must establish a schedule implementing the 75 management strategies, establish a basis for evaluating the 76 planâs effectiveness, and identify feasible funding strategies 77 for implementing the planâs management strategies. The 78 management strategies may include regional treatment systems or 79 other public works, when appropriate, and voluntary trading of 80 water quality credits to achieve the needed pollutant load 81 reductions. 82 2.âA basin management action plan must equitably allocate, 83 pursuant to paragraph (6)(b), pollutant load reductions to 84 individual basins, as a whole to all basins, or to each 85 identified point source or category of nonpoint sources, as 86 appropriate. For nonpoint sources for which best management 87 practices have been adopted, the initial requirement specified 88 by the plan must be those practices developed pursuant to 89 paragraph (c). When appropriate, the plan may consider take into 90 account the benefits of pollutant load reduction achieved by 91 point or nonpoint sources that have implemented management 92 strategies to reduce pollutant loads, including best management 93 practices, before the development of the basin management action 94 plan. The allocation must consider projected increases in 95 pollutant loading related to population growth as estimated by 96 the University of Florida Bureau of Economic and Business 97 Research and projected increases in pollutant loading related to 98 agricultural growth based on agricultural water use estimates by 99 the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services. The plan 100 must provide strategies for mitigating or eliminating the 101 pollutant load increases for the life of the plan. The 102 strategies must be reevaluated during each plan update The plan 103 must also identify the mechanisms that will address potential 104 future increases in pollutant loading. 105 3.âThe basin management action planning process is intended 106 to involve the broadest possible range of interested parties, 107 with the objective of encouraging the greatest amount of 108 cooperation and consensus possible. In developing a basin 109 management action plan, the department shall assure that key 110 stakeholders, including, but not limited to, applicable local 111 governments, water management districts, the Department of 112 Agriculture and Consumer Services, other appropriate state 113 agencies, local soil and water conservation districts, 114 environmental groups, regulated interests, and affected 115 pollution sources, are invited to participate in the process. 116 The department shall hold at least one public meeting in the 117 vicinity of the watershed or basin to discuss and receive 118 comments during the planning process and shall otherwise 119 encourage public participation to the greatest practicable 120 extent. Notice of the public meeting must be published in a 121 newspaper of general circulation in each county in which the 122 watershed or basin lies at least 5 days, but not more than 15 123 days, before the public meeting. A basin management action plan 124 does not supplant or otherwise alter any assessment made under 125 subsection (3) or subsection (4) or any calculation or initial 126 allocation. 127 4.a.âEach new or revised basin management action plan must 128 include all of the following: 129 (I)a.âThe appropriate management strategies available 130 through existing water quality protection programs to achieve 131 total maximum daily loads, which may provide for phased 132 implementation to promote timely, cost-effective actions as 133 provided for in s. 403.151. 134 (II)b.âA description of best management practices adopted 135 by rule. 136 (III)c.âFor the applicable 5-year implementation milestone, 137 a list of projects that will achieve the pollutant load 138 reductions needed to meet the total maximum daily load or the 139 load allocations established pursuant to subsection (6). Each 140 project must include a planning-level cost estimate and an 141 estimated date of completion. 142 (IV)d.âA list of projects developed pursuant to paragraph 143 (e), if applicable. 144 (V)e.âThe source and amount of financial assistance to be 145 made available by the department, a water management district, 146 or other entity for each listed project, if applicable. 147 (VI)f.âA planning-level estimate of each listed projectâs 148 expected load reduction, if applicable. 149 b.âFor each project listed pursuant to this subparagraph 150 which has a total cost that exceeds $1 million, the department 151 shall, through integrated and comprehensive monitoring, assess 152 whether the project is working to reduce nutrient pollution or 153 water use, or both, as intended. The written assessments must be 154 completed expeditiously and included in each plan update. 155 5.âThe department shall adopt all or any part of a basin 156 management action plan and any amendment to such plan by 157 secretarial order pursuant to chapter 120 to implement this 158 section. 159 6.âThe basin management action plan must include 5-year 160 milestones for implementation and water quality improvement, and 161 an associated water quality monitoring component sufficient to 162 evaluate whether reasonable progress in pollutant load 163 reductions is being achieved over time. An assessment of 164 progress toward these milestones must shall be conducted every 5 165 years, and revisions to the plan shall be made as appropriate. 166 Any entity with a specific pollutant load reduction requirement 167 established in a basin management action plan shall identify the 168 projects or strategies that such entity will undertake to meet 169 current 5-year pollution reduction milestones, beginning with 170 the first 5-year milestone for new basin management action 171 plans, and submit such projects to the department for inclusion 172 in the appropriate basin management action plan. Each project 173 identified must include an estimated amount of nutrient 174 reduction that is reasonably expected to be achieved based on 175 the best scientific information available. Revisions to the 176 basin management action plan must shall be made by the 177 department in cooperation with basin stakeholders. Revisions to 178 the management strategies required for nonpoint sources must 179 follow the procedures in subparagraph (c)4. Revised basin 180 management action plans must be adopted pursuant to subparagraph 181 5. 182 7.âIn accordance with procedures adopted by rule under 183 paragraph (9)(c), basin management action plans, and other 184 pollution control programs under local, state, or federal 185 authority as provided in subsection (4), may allow point or 186 nonpoint sources that will achieve greater pollutant reductions 187 than required by an adopted total maximum daily load or 188 wasteload allocation to generate, register, and trade water 189 quality credits for the excess reductions to enable other 190 sources to achieve their allocation; however, the generation of 191 water quality credits does not remove the obligation of a source 192 or activity to meet applicable technology requirements or 193 adopted best management practices. Such plans must allow trading 194 between NPDES permittees, and trading that may or may not 195 involve NPDES permittees, where the generation or use of the 196 credits involve an entity or activity not subject to department 197 water discharge permits whose owner voluntarily elects to obtain 198 department authorization for the generation and sale of credits. 199 8.âThe departmentâs rule relating to the equitable 200 abatement of pollutants into surface waters does do not apply to 201 water bodies or waterbody segments for which a basin management 202 plan that considers takes into account future new or expanded 203 activities or discharges has been adopted under this section. 204 9.âIn order to promote resilient wastewater utilities, if 205 the department identifies domestic wastewater treatment 206 facilities or onsite sewage treatment and disposal systems as 207 contributors of at least 20 percent of point source or nonpoint 208 source nutrient pollution or if the department determines 209 remediation is necessary to achieve the total maximum daily 210 load, a basin management action plan for a nutrient total 211 maximum daily load must include the following: 212 a.âA domestic wastewater treatment plan developed by each 213 local government, in cooperation with the department, the water 214 management district, and the public and private domestic 215 wastewater treatment facilities providing services or located 216 within the jurisdiction of the local government, which addresses 217 domestic wastewater. Private domestic wastewater facilities and 218 special districts providing domestic wastewater services must 219 provide the required wastewater facility information to the 220 applicable local governments. The domestic wastewater treatment 221 plan must: 222 (I)âProvide for construction, expansion, or upgrades 223 necessary to achieve the total maximum daily load requirements 224 applicable to the domestic wastewater treatment facility. 225 (II)âInclude the permitted capacity in average annual 226 gallons per day for the domestic wastewater treatment facility; 227 the average nutrient concentration and the estimated average 228 nutrient load of the domestic wastewater; a projected timeline 229 of the dates by which the construction of any facility 230 improvements will begin and be completed and the date by which 231 operations of the improved facility will begin; the estimated 232 cost of the improvements; and the identity of responsible 233 parties. 234 235 The domestic wastewater treatment plan must be adopted as part 236 of the basin management action plan no later than July 1, 2025. 237 A local government that does not have a domestic wastewater 238 treatment facility in its jurisdiction is not required to 239 develop a domestic wastewater treatment plan unless there is a 240 demonstrated need to establish a domestic wastewater treatment 241 facility within its jurisdiction to improve water quality 242 necessary to achieve a total maximum daily load. A local 243 government is not responsible for a private domestic wastewater 244 facilityâs compliance with a basin management action plan unless 245 such facility is operated through a public-private partnership 246 to which the local government is a party. 247 b.âAn onsite sewage treatment and disposal system 248 remediation plan developed by each local government in 249 cooperation with the department, the Department of Health, water 250 management districts, and public and private domestic wastewater 251 treatment facilities. 252 (I)âThe onsite sewage treatment and disposal system 253 remediation plan must identify cost-effective and financially 254 feasible projects necessary to achieve the nutrient load 255 reductions required for onsite sewage treatment and disposal 256 systems. To identify cost-effective and financially feasible 257 projects for remediation of onsite sewage treatment and disposal 258 systems, the local government shall: 259 (A)âInclude an inventory of onsite sewage treatment and 260 disposal systems based on the best information available; 261 (B)âIdentify onsite sewage treatment and disposal systems 262 that would be eliminated through connection to existing or 263 future central domestic wastewater infrastructure in the 264 jurisdiction or domestic wastewater service area of the local 265 government, that would be replaced with or upgraded to enhanced 266 nutrient-reducing onsite sewage treatment and disposal systems, 267 or that would remain on conventional onsite sewage treatment and 268 disposal systems; 269 (C)âEstimate the costs of potential onsite sewage treatment 270 and disposal system connections, upgrades, or replacements; and 271 (D)âIdentify deadlines and interim milestones for the 272 planning, design, and construction of projects. 273 (II)âThe department shall adopt the onsite sewage treatment 274 and disposal system remediation plan as part of the basin 275 management action plan no later than July 1, 2025, or as 276 required for Outstanding Florida Springs under s. 373.807. 277 10.âThe installation of new onsite sewage treatment and 278 disposal systems constructed within a basin management action 279 plan area adopted under this section, a reasonable assurance 280 plan, or a pollution reduction plan is prohibited where 281 connection to a publicly owned or investor-owned sewerage system 282 is available as defined in s. 381.0065(2)(a). On lots of 1 acre 283 or less within a basin management action plan adopted under this 284 section, a reasonable assurance plan, or a pollution reduction 285 plan where a publicly owned or investor-owned sewerage system is 286 not available, the installation of enhanced nutrient-reducing 287 onsite sewage treatment and disposal systems or other wastewater 288 treatment systems that achieve at least 65 percent nitrogen 289 reduction is required. 290 11.âWhen identifying wastewater projects in a basin 291 management action plan, the department may not require the 292 higher cost option if it achieves the same nutrient load 293 reduction as a lower cost option. A regulated entity may choose 294 a different cost option if it complies with the pollutant 295 reduction requirements of an adopted total maximum daily load 296 and meets or exceeds the pollution reduction requirement of the 297 original project. 298 12.âAnnually, local governments subject to a basin 299 management action plan or located within the basin of a 300 waterbody not attaining nutrient or nutrient-related standards 301 must provide to the department an update on the status of 302 construction of sanitary sewers to serve such areas, in a manner 303 prescribed by the department. 304 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.